lexc-files/prs-num/precessive-consequential.txt
!=================================
LEXICON IntrPrecCnsq
!  person/number markers for
!     intransitive precessive
!                  consequential I
!=================================
!----------------------|-----------------------|----------------------|----------------------|
^[3Sg]:^n      Enclitic; ^[1Sg]:^ma    Enclitic; ^[2Sg]:^vek  Enclitic; ^[4Sg]:^mi   Enclitic;
^[3Pl]:^ta     Enclitic; ^[1Pl]:^mta   Enclitic; ^[2Pl]:^fsi  Enclitic; ^[4Pl]:^meng Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^yek    Enclitic; ^[1Du]:^mtung Enclitic; ^[2Du]:^ftek Enclitic; ^[4Du]:^mek  Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^gkenka Enclitic;
!----------------------|-----------------------|----------------------|----------------------|

!===============================
LEXICON TrnsPrecCnsq
!  person/number markers for
!     transitive precessive 
!                consequential I
!===============================
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[3Sg.3Sg]:^gu         Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Pl]:^ki        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Du]:^kek        Enclitic;
^[3Pl.3Sg]:^tgu        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Pl]:^tki       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Du]:^tkek       Enclitic;
^[3Du.3Sg]:^gnegu      Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Pl]:^gneki     Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Du]:^gnekek     Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[1Sg.3Sg]:^mkun       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Pl]:^mki       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Du]:^mkek       Enclitic;
^[1Pl.3Sg]:^mteggu     Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Pl]:^mteki     Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Du]:^mtekek     Enclitic;
^[1Du.3Sg]:^mtegnegu   Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Pl]:^mtegneki  Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Du]:^mtegnekek  Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[2Sg.3Sg]:^vgu        Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Pl]:^fki       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Du]:^fkek       Enclitic;
^[2Pl.3Sg]:^fsigu      Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Pl]:^fsiki     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Du]:^fsikek     Enclitic;
^[2Du.3Sg]:^ftegnegu   Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Pl]:^ftegneki  Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Du]:^ftegnekek  Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[4Sg.3Sg]:^migu       Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Pl]:^miki      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Du]:^mikek      Enclitic;
^[4Pl.3Sg]:^megteggu   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Pl]:^megteki   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Du]:^megtekek   Enclitic;
^[4Du.3Sg]:^megnegu    Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Pl]:^megneki   Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Du]:^megnekek   Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[3Sg.1Sg]:^nga        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Pl]:^nkut      Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Du]:^nkung      Enclitic;
^[3Pl.1Sg]:^tnga       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Pl]:^nkut      Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Du]:^nkung      Enclitic;
^[3Du.1Sg]:^gnenga     Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Pl]:^nkut      Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Du]:^nkung      Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
! no [1--.1--] forms                                                                            |
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[2Sg.1Sg]:^vnga       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Pl]:^fkut      Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Du]:^fkung      Enclitic;
^[2Pl.1Sg]:^fsinga     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Pl]:^fsikut    Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Du]:^fsikung    Enclitic;
^[2Du.1Sg]:^ftegnenga  Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Pl]:^ftegnekut Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Du]:^ftegnekung Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[4Sg.1Sg]:^minga      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Pl]:^mikut     Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Du]:^mikung     Enclitic;
^[4Pl.1Sg]:^megtengnga Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Pl]:^megtekut  Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Du]:^megtekung  Enclitic;
^[4Du.1Sg]:^megnenga   Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Pl]:^megneku   Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Du]:^megnekung  Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[3Sg.2Sg]:^ten        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Pl]:^si        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Du]:^stek       Enclitic;
^[3Pl.2Sg]:^ten        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Pl]:^si        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Du]:^stek       Enclitic;
^[3Du.2Sg]:^ten        Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Pl]:^si        Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Du]:^stek       Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[1Sg.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Pl]:^msi       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Du]:^mtek       Enclitic;
^[1Pl.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Pl]:^msi       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Du]:^mtek       Enclitic;
^[1Du.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Pl]:^msi       Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Du]:^mtek       Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
! no [2--.2--] forms                                                      |
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[4Sg.2Sg]:^miten      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Pl]:^misi      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Du]:^mitek      Enclitic;
^[4Pl.2Sg]:^miten      Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Pl]:^misi      Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Du]:^mitek      Enclitic;
^[4Du.2Sg]:^miten      Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Pl]:^misi      Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Du]:^mitek      Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[3Sg.4Sg]:^tni        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.4Pl]:^steng     Enclitic; ^[3Sg.4Du]:^stek       Enclitic;
^[3Pl.4Sg]:^tni        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.4Pl]:^steng     Enclitic; ^[3Pl.4Du]:^stek       Enclitic;
^[3Du.4Sg]:^tni        Enclitic; ^[3Du.4Pl]:^steng     Enclitic; ^[3Du.4Du]:^stek       Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[1Sg.4Sg]:^mni        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.4Pl]:^mteng     Enclitic; ^[1Sg.4Du]:^mtek       Enclitic;
^[1Pl.4Sg]:^mnni       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.4Pl]:^mteng     Enclitic; ^[1Pl.4Du]:^mtek       Enclitic;
^[1Du.4Sg]:^mtegnegu   Enclitic; ^[1Du.4Pl]:^mtegneki  Enclitic; ^[1Du.4Du]:^mtegnekek  Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[2Sg.4Sg]:^vgu        Enclitic; ^[2Sg.4Pl]:^fki       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.4Du]:^fkek       Enclitic;
^[2Pl.4Sg]:^fsigu      Enclitic; ^[2Pl.4Pl]:^fsiki     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.4Du]:^fsikek     Enclitic;
^[2Du.4Sg]:^ftegnegu   Enclitic; ^[2Du.4Pl]:^ftegneki  Enclitic; ^[2Du.4Du]:^ftegnekek  Enclitic;
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
! no [4--.4--] forms                                                                            |
!------------------------------|-------------------------------|--------------------------------|
